Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 5

Housing Trust Fund

13-23-501. Establishment — Purpose.

Any unit or units of local government, upon recommendation of the chief executive officer of the unit, may establish a housing trust fund, hereinafter referred to as the “fund”, for the purposes set out in this part, to be administered by an entity approved by the participating unit or units of local government, such as a community foundation, a housing partnership, or a housing development agency, hereinafter referred to as “the approved entity”, in accordance with this part. The cost of administering the fund shall be borne out of the fund itself, consistent with the initial plan approved by the participating unit or units of local government.

The fund provided by this part shall be used to provide low income persons with safe and affordable housing. Proceeds from the fund shall be loaned, or grants made available, for programs to include, but not be limited to, the following:

Funding nonprofit housing development corporations to develop affordable low income housing. Funds may be used to support projects where a nonprofit entity acts as a general partner for a limited partnership, as a sole developer, or as a joint venture investor. Projects may be affordable rental housing, property developed for resale to low income buyers, or rent to own programs;

Funding ongoing existing housing programs which have been established to assist low income households; and

Funding soft costs, such as housing counseling, predevelopment costs, and administrative costs of nonprofit entities related to low income housing development.

Acts 1990, ch. 986, § 2.

13-23-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Housing trust fund” means a fund consisting of appropriations, reserves or dedications of any revenues except pension or retirement funds by a participating unit or units of local government, together with private and foundation sources of funds, all used for providing low income persons with safe and affordable housing;

“Low income” means qualified persons or families who lack the amount of income which is necessary, as determined by the approved entity, to enable them without low interest financial assistance, to live in decent, safe and affordable dwellings without overcrowding; and

“Unit or units of local government” means any city or county, separately or together, that sets up a program to establish a housing trust fund.

Acts 1990, ch. 986, § 3.

13-23-503. Use of loans or grants — Disposition of funds.

Any loans or grants from the fund to applicants, including interest earned on investment or repayments of such loans, shall be used to benefit low income individuals or families residing within the participating unit or units of local government.

All funds received for the purposes herein provided and all such interest repayments shall be added to the fund and deposited in accredited financial institutions located within the participating unit or units of local government by the approved entity administering the fund.

Such funds shall be deposited in a separate account earmarked to be used solely for programs established through and included in the housing trust fund pursuant to this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 986, § 4.

13-23-504. Design of program and promulgation of rules by approved entity.

The approved entity shall design and tailor the program according to low income needs and requirements and shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations to implement the effect and intent of this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 986, § 5.

13-23-505. Special escrow account — Revenue sources.

Any participating unit of local government may create a special escrow account earmarked for the sole purpose of generating revenue to transfer to the housing trust fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a participating unit of local government may specifically authorize that any revenue source, except pension or retirement funds over which the unit of local government has authority to levy and collect, may be used to provide endowment and contributions to the housing trust fund, either directly or through deposit in the special escrow account, and then by transfer to the housing trust fund.

Acts 1990, ch. 986, § 6.

13-23-506. Applicability of part.

This part shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than three hundred nineteen thousand six hundred twenty-five (319,625) nor more than three hundred nineteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five (319,725), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1990, ch. 986, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-23-120. Issuance of bonds and notes — Bond finance committee — Creation.